Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB549.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "pregnancy resource center" means any health facility,
place, or institution, that is not a hospital, is not in a hospital or a private
residence, and is established to provide pregnancy health care services to women
who are pregnant or may be pregnant, including:
(a) Pregnancy testing;
(b) Counseling;
(c) Ultrasounds; and
(d) Other pregnancy-related services.
(2) A pregnancy resource center operating in this state shall be licensed in
accordance with this section.
(3) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A establishing licensure standards for pregnancy resource centers.
The administrative regulations shall establish the following requirements:
(a) Sanitation standards;
(b) Staff qualifications;
(c) Necessary emergency equipment;
(d) Procedures to provide emergency care;
(e) Procedures to monitor patients after the administration of anesthesia;
(f) Procedures to provide follow-up care for patient complications;
(g) Quality assurance standards;
(h) Infection control;
(i) Provision of informed consent brochures;
(j) Provision of a hotline telephone number to provide assistance for patients
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 9/16/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 915
who are:
1. Coerced into an abortion; or
2. Victims of sex trafficking;
(k) Annual training by law enforcement officers on identifying and assisting
women who are:
1. Coerced into an abortion; or
2. Victims of sex trafficking;
(l) Operational policies, supervision requirements, and maintenance of medical
records, including the requirement that all forms requiring a patient
signature be stored in the patient's medical record;
(m) Procedures for the issuance, renewal, denial, and revocation of licenses
under this section; and
(n) The licensure process, including:
1. The form and content of the license;
2. The collection of an annual license fee;
3. The procedures and standards for inspection;
4. A plan of correction process to address any violations of this section or
administrative regulations promulgated under this section; and
5. A process for disciplinary action.
(4) A person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if he or she knowingly or
intentionally:
(a) Operates a pregnancy resource center that is not licensed under this
section; or
(b) Advertises the operation of a pregnancy resource center that is not licensed
under this section.
(5) (a) Nothing in this section is intended to expand or limit the liability of a health
care provider or a pregnancy resource center.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 9/16/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 915
(b) In the event of an action for injury or death due to any act or omission of a
health care provider rendering services at a pregnancy resource center from
which an injured patient is transferred to any other licensed health care
provider or licensed health care facility, the liability of the subsequent
licensed health care provider or licensed health care facility shall be limited
to their own negligent acts and omissions that violate standards of care
according to existing law, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) If the subsequent licensed health care provider or licensed health care
facility owns, operates, or provides care at the pregnancy resource center,
the licensed health care provider or licensed health care facility shall be
liable for acts or omissions that violate applicable standards of care and
occur at a pregnancy resource center that the licensed health care provider
or licensed health care facility owns or operates.
Section 2. KRS 216B.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who, in willful violation of this chapter, operates a health facility, [or
]abortion facility, or pregnancy resource center as defined in Section 1 of this Act
without first obtaining a license or continues to operate a health facility, [or
]abortion facility, or pregnancy resource center after a final decision suspending or
revoking a license shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.
(2) Any person who, in willful violation of this chapter, acquires major medical
equipment, establishes a health facility, or obligates a capital expenditure without
first obtaining a certificate of need, or after the applicable certificate of need has
been withdrawn, shall be fined one percent (1%) of the capital expenditure involved
but not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.
(3) Any health care provider or hospital acting by or through its agents or employees
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 9/16/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 915
which violates any provision of KRS 216B.400 shall be punished by a fine of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). The
cabinet shall establish an online portal on its website for reporting violations of
KRS 216B.400.
(4) Any health facility which willfully violates KRS 216B.250 shall be fined one
hundred dollars ($100) per day for failure to post required notices and one hundred
dollars ($100) per instance for willfully failing to provide an itemized statement
within the required time frames.
(5) In addition to the civil penalties established under KRS 216B.306(1) and (4), any
person who advertises, solicits boarders, or operates a boarding home without first
obtaining a registration as required by KRS 216B.305 and any person who aids or
abets the operation of a boarding home that is not registered shall be imprisoned for
no more than twelve (12) months.
(6) Any person or entity establishing, managing, or operating an abortion facility or
conducting the business of an abortion facility which otherwise violates any
provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder
regarding abortion facilities shall be subject to revocation or suspension of the
license of the abortion facility. In addition, any violation of any provision of this
chapter regarding abortion facilities or any administrative regulation related thereto
by intent, fraud, deceit, unlawful design, willful and deliberate misrepresentation, or
by careless, negligent, or incautious disregard for the statute or administrative
regulation, either by persons acting individually or in concert with others, shall
constitute a violation and shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each offense. Each day of continuing violation shall be
considered a separate offense. The venue for prosecution of the violation shall be in
any county of the state in which the violation, or any portion thereof, occurred.
(7) Any hospital acting by or through its agents or employees that violates any
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 9/16/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 915
provision of KRS 216B.150 shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.
(8) Any health facility acting by or through its agents or employees that violates any
provision of KRS 216B.153 shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 9/16/2025 12:37 PM Jacketed